Florida, session 2026, HB5503.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund
within the Executive Office of the Governor, which is to be
terminated pursuant to Section 19(f), Article III of the State
Constitution on February 17, 2026, is re-created.
Section 2. Section 252.3711, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
252.3711 Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund.—
(1) The Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund is
created within the Executive Office of the Governor.
(2) The fund is established for use as a depository for
state moneys specifically transferred or appropriated to the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5503 -01-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5503, Engrossed 1 2026
fund by the Legislature. The moneys deposited in the fund are
available as a primary funding source for the Governor for
purposes of preparing or responding to an emergency as defined
in s. 252.34(4) disaster declared by the Governor as a state of
emergency that exceeds regularly appropriated funding sources.
(a) Moneys in the fund may be used for a state of
emergency that is a natural emergency as defined in s.
252.34(8). If such state of emergency has been renewed pursuant
to s. 252.36, the use of moneys in the fund is subject to the
notice, review, and objection procedures set forth in s.
216.177.
(b) Moneys in the fund may be used for a state of emergency
that is a manmade emergency as defined in s. 252.34(7) or a
technological emergency as defined in s. 252.34(12), subject to
the notice, review, and objection procedures set forth in s.
216.177. Notwithstanding s. 216.177(2)(b), either the chair or
vice chair of the Legislative Budget Commission or the President
of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives may
timely advise, in writing, that an action or proposed action
exceeds the delegated authority or is contrary to legislative
policy and intent.
(c) Moneys in the fund may not be used to purchase
aircraft, boats, or motor vehicles.
(d) Moneys in the fund may not be invested as provided in
s. 17.61 but shall be retained in the fund for investment with
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5503 -01-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5503, Engrossed 1 2026
interest appropriated to the General Revenue Fund as provided in
s. 17.57.
(3) Federal reimbursements of state emergency expenditures
shall not be deposited in the fund. Federal reimbursements of
state emergency expenditures shall be deposited in the General
Revenue Fund pursuant to s. 215.32(2)(a).
(4) On or before the 15th day of the month following each
quarter, the Executive Office of the Governor shall submit a
report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives that includes the following:
(a) The projected year-end cash balance of the fund;
(b) An updated cash flow statement for that fiscal year;
(c) An accounting of all inventory and assets purchased,
separated by emergency event and agency, for preparing for,
responding to, or recovering from a state of emergency and the
current status of such assets; and
(d) A written attestation, under penalty of perjury, from
the director of the Division of Emergency Management that the
information in the report is true, accurate, and complete.
(5)(3) In accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the
State Constitution, The Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund
shall, unless terminated sooner, be terminated on July 1, 2030 4
years after the effective date of this act. Before its scheduled
termination, the fund shall be reviewed as provided in s.
215.3208 s. 215.3206(1) and (2).
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5503 -01-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5503, Engrossed 1 2026
Section 3. This act shall operate retroactively to
February 17, 2026.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5503 -01-e1